Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 3 Distribution of Estate in Kind

53-2-30.
Authority of administrator; method of distribution provided for in will.

An administrator may distribute all or a portion of an intestate estate in kind in a distribution that is pro rata as to each asset.

An administrator may distribute all or a portion of an intestate estate in kind in a distribution that is not pro rata as to each asset only upon the written consent of all the heirs or upon an order of the probate court made pursuant to a petition filed by an heir or the administrator.

Nothing in this Code section shall be construed as limiting or restricting the method of distribution provided for in a will or as requiring the approval of the probate court for a distribution or division in kind made pursuant to the directions in a will. In all cases where the will directs or authorizes a distribution or division in kind but fails to direct specifically how or by whom the distribution or division in kind is to be made, it shall be the duty and authority of the executor or administrator with the will annexed to make the distribution or division in kind.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-30

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-31.
Petition in probate court; distribution in kind not pro rata.

An heir or the administrator may petition the probate court for an order allowing a distribution in kind that is not pro rata as to each asset. The petition shall set forth the names and addresses of all the heirs and the requested distribution of the assets. Upon the filing of the petition, a citation shall be issued and parties in interest shall be served as provided in Chapter 11 of this title.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-31

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-2-32.
Order of probate court.

If no objection is made to the petition, the probate court shall order the administrator to distribute the assets in the manner requested in the petition. If objection is made, upon the evidence submitted, the probate court shall divide the assets in kind in shares that are pro rata or are not pro rata as to each asset and order the administrator to distribute the shares accordingly.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-2-32

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).